Hawaii statutes.
§712-1255 Conditional discharge. (1)
Whenever any person who has not previously been convicted of any offense under
this chapter or chapter 329 or under any statute of the United States or of any
state relating to a dangerous drug, harmful drug, detrimental drug, or an
intoxicating compound, pleads guilty to or is found guilty of promoting a
dangerous drug, harmful drug, detrimental drug, or an intoxicating compound
under section 712-1243, 712-1245, 712-1246, 712-1248, 712-1249, or 712-1250,
the court, without entering a judgment of guilt and with the consent of the
accused, may defer further proceedings and place the accused on probation upon
terms and conditions. Upon violation of a term or condition, the court may
enter an adjudication of guilt and proceed as otherwise provided.

(2) Upon fulfillment of the terms and
conditions, the court shall discharge the person and dismiss the proceedings
against the person.

(3) Discharge and dismissal under this section
shall be without adjudication of guilt and is not a conviction for purposes of
this section or for purposes of disqualifications or disabilities imposed by
law upon conviction of a crime.

(4) There may be only one discharge and
dismissal under this section with respect to any person.

(5) After conviction, for any offense under
this chapter or chapter 329, but prior to sentencing, the court shall be
advised by the prosecutor whether the conviction is defendant's first or a
subsequent offense. If it is not a first offense, the prosecutor shall file an
information setting forth the prior convictions. The defendant shall have the
opportunity in open court to affirm or deny that the defendant is identical
with the person previously convicted. If the defendant denies the identity,
sentence shall be postponed for such time as to permit the trial, before a jury
if the defendant has a right to trial by jury and demands a jury, on the sole
issue of the defendant's identity with the person previously convicted. [L
1972, c 9, pt of §1; am L 1987, c 176, §10; gen ch 1993]

Case Notes

Conditional discharge procedures are not applicable to
offense under §712-1247(1)(e), which is not included among the offenses listed
in this section. 58 H. 412, 570 P.2d 1323 (1977).

Conditional discharge of defendant under this section is not
a final disposition of the case appealable by the State. 60 H. 576, 592 P.2d
832 (1979).

Order granting belated motion for reconsideration or
correction of sentence and conditional discharge under section is not a
reversal of criminal conviction for purposes of Hawaii Supreme Court rule 2.13
(attorneys convicted of crimes). 73 H. 172, 829 P.2d 1329 (1992).

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next